Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-358.04
Delinquent permanent child support payments; remarriage; effect.

Remarriage of the person entitled to collect under a permanent child support decree shall not work to cut off delinquent payments due under such decree.

Laws 1975, LB 212, § 6.